Illinois, session 104th, HB1753.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 8-12-2, 8-12-3, 8-12-4, and 8-12-23 and by 6adding Sections 8-12-4.5, 8-12-10.5, and 8-12-21.5 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-2)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-12-2)8    Sec. 8-12-2. (a) Pursuant to the authority of the General 9Assembly to provide for the public health, safety and welfare, 10the General Assembly hereby finds and declares that it is the 11public policy and a public purpose of the State to offer 12assistance to a financially distressed city so that it may 13provide for the health, safety and welfare of its citizens, 14pay when due principal and interest on its debt obligations, 15meet financial obligations to its employees, vendors and 16suppliers, and provide for proper financial accounting 17procedures, budgeting and taxing practices, as well as 18strengthen the human and economic development of the city.19    (b) It is the purpose of this Division to provide a secure 20financial basis for the continued operation of a financially 21distressed city. The intention of the General Assembly, in 22enacting this legislation is to establish sound, efficient and 23generally accepted accounting, budgeting and taxing procedures   HB1753- 2 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1and practices within a financially distressed city, to provide 2powers to a financial advisory authority established for a 3financially distressed city, and to impose restrictions upon a 4financially distressed city in order to assist that city in 5assuring its financial integrity while leaving municipal 6services policies to the city, consistent with the 7requirements for satisfying the public policy and purposes 8herein set forth.9    (c) It also is the purpose of this Division to authorize a 10city which has been certified and designated as a financially 11distressed city under the procedure set forth in Section 128-12-4, and which has by ordinance requested that a financial 13advisory authority be appointed for the city and that the city 14receive assistance as provided in this Division, and which has 15filed certified copies of that ordinance in the manner 16provided by Section 8-12-4, to enter into such agreements as 17are necessary to receive assistance as provided in this 18Division and in applicable provisions of the Illinois Finance 19Authority Act.20(Source: P.A. 93-205, eff. 1-1-04.) 21    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-3)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-12-3)22    Sec. 8-12-3. As used in this Division: 23    (1) "Authority" means the "(Name of Financially Distressed 24City) Financial Advisory Authority".25    (2) "Financially distressed city" means a home rule any   HB1753- 3 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1municipality which is a home rule unit and which (i) is 2certified and designated by the Department of Revenue as being 3in the highest 5% of all home rule municipalities in terms of 4the aggregate of the rate per cent of all taxes levied pursuant 5to statute or ordinance upon all taxable property of the 6municipality and as being in the lowest 5% of all home rule 7municipalities in terms of per capita tax yield, and (ii) is 8designated by joint resolution of the General Assembly as a 9financially distressed city under Section 8-12-4.10    (3) "Home rule municipality" means a municipality which is 11a home rule unit as provided in Section 6 of Article VII of the 12Illinois Constitution.13    (4) "Budget" means an annual appropriation ordinance or 14annual budget as described in Division 2 of Article 8, as from 15time to time in effect in the financially distressed city.16    (5) "Chairperson" means the chairperson of the Authority 17appointed pursuant to Section 8-12-7.18    (6) "Financial Plan" means the financially distressed 19city's financial plan as developed pursuant to Section 208-12-15, as from time to time in effect.21    (7) "Fiscal year" means the fiscal year of the financially 22distressed city.23    (8) "Obligations" means bonds, notes or other evidence of 24indebtedness issued by the Illinois Finance Authority in 25connection with the provision of financial aid to a 26financially distressed city pursuant to this Division and   HB1753- 4 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1applicable provisions of the Illinois Finance Authority Act.2(Source: P.A. 93-205, eff. 1-1-04.) 3    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-4)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-12-4)4    Sec. 8-12-4. Certification and designation as financially 5distressed city. 6    (a) In order to be certified as a financially distressed 7city and receive assistance as provided in this Division: ,8        (1) a home rule municipality shall first, by ordinance 9    passed by its corporate authorities, request (i) that the 10    Department of Revenue certify that it is in the highest 5% 11    of all home rule municipalities in terms of the aggregate 12    of the rate per cent of all taxes levied pursuant to 13    statute or ordinance upon all taxable property of the 14    municipality and in the lowest 5% of all home rule 15    municipalities in terms of per capita tax yield, and (ii) 16    that the General Assembly by joint resolution designate it 17    as a financially distressed city. A home rule municipality 18    which is so certified and designated as a financially 19    distressed city and which desires to receive assistance as 20    provided in this Division shall, by ordinance passed by 21    its corporate authorities, request that a financial 22    advisory authority be appointed for the city and that the 23    city receive assistance as provided in this Division, and 24    shall file a certified copy of that ordinance with the 25    Governor, with the Clerk of the House of Representatives   HB1753- 5 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1    and with the Secretary of the Senate; or .2        (2) the State Comptroller may conduct a preliminary 3    review to determine the existence of probable financial 4    stress within a home rule municipality if one or more of 5    the following occur: 6            (A) the State Comptroller requests that the 7        Department of Revenue certify that the municipality is 8        in the highest 5% of all home rule municipalities in 9        terms of the aggregate of the rate per cent of all 10        taxes levied pursuant to statute or ordinance upon all 11        taxable property of the municipality and in the lowest 12        5% of all home rule municipalities in terms of per 13        capita tax yield, and the Department certifies the 14        same; 15            (B) the city council or the mayor of a 16        municipality or school board makes a written request 17        for a preliminary review and that request identifies 18        the existing or anticipated financial conditions or 19        events that make the request necessary; 20            (C) the State Comptroller receives a written 21        request from a creditor with an undisputed claim 22        against the municipality that exceeds the greater of 23        $10,000 or 1% of the annual general fund budget of the 24        municipality and that remains unpaid 6 months after 25        its due date provided that the creditor notifies the 26        municipality in writing at least 30 days before its   HB1753- 6 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1        request to the State Comptroller of its intention to 2        submit a written request under this paragraph; 3            (D) the State Comptroller receives, not earlier 4        than 60 days before the next municipal election, a 5        petition containing specific allegations of municipal 6        financial distress signed by at least 25% of the 7        electors within the municipality who voted at the last 8        general election at which a Governor was elected; 9            (E) the State Comptroller receives written 10        notification that a municipality has not timely 11        deposited its minimum obligation payment to the 12        municipality's pension fund as required by law; 13            (F) the State Comptroller receives written 14        notification that the municipality has failed for a 15        period of 7 days or more after the scheduled date of 16        payment to pay wages and salaries or other 17        compensation owed to employees or benefits owed to 18        retirees; 19            (G) the State Comptroller receives written 20        notification from a trustee, paying agent, bondholder, 21        or auditor engaged by the municipality of a default in 22        a bond or note payment or a violation of one or more 23        bond or note covenants; 24            (H) the State Comptroller receives a resolution 25        from either chamber of the General Assembly requesting 26        a preliminary review;   HB1753- 7 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1            (I) the municipality is delinquent in the 2        distribution of tax revenues, as required by law, that 3        it has collected for another taxing jurisdiction, and 4        that taxing jurisdiction requests a preliminary 5        review; 6            (J) the municipality has been assigned a long-term 7        debt rating within or below the BBB category or its 8        equivalent by one or more nationally recognized credit 9        rating agencies; or 10            (K) the existence of other facts or circumstances 11        that, in the State Comptroller's sole discretion, are 12        indicative of probable financial stress. 13        Before commencing the preliminary review under this 14    paragraph (2), the State Comptroller shall provide the 15    municipality written notification that he or she intends 16    to conduct a preliminary review. Elected and appointed 17    officials of the municipality shall promptly and fully 18    provide the assistance and information requested by the 19    State Comptroller for that municipality in conducting the 20    preliminary review. The State Comptroller shall provide a 21    preliminary report of his or her findings to the 22    municipality within 20 days after the date the preliminary 23    review begins. A copy of the preliminary report shall be 24    provided to each State Senator and State Representative 25    who represents that municipality. The municipality may 26    provide comments to the State Comptroller concerning the   HB1753- 8 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1    preliminary report within 5 days after the preliminary 2    report is provided to the municipality.3        If the State Comptroller believes there is probable 4    financial stress after his or her preliminary review and 5    any input from the municipality, the State Comptroller 6    shall establish a review team under Section 8-12-4.5. A 7    copy of the preliminary report shall be provided to the 8    review team and each State Senator and State 9    Representative who represents that municipality, and the 10    review shall be posted on the State Comptroller's website. 11    The review team shall examine the financial situation of 12    the municipality and complete a final report as provided 13    in Section 8-12-4.5. 14        If the Governor believes that probable financial 15    stress exists for the municipality to be certified as a 16    financially distressed city under this Section after 17    reviewing a final report prepared under Section 8-12-4.5, 18    the Governor may, by proclamation, certify and designate 19    the municipality as a financially distressed city and 20    authorize appointment of the municipality's Authority 21    under Section 8-12-7. The proclamation shall be filed with 22    the Secretary of State and the corporate authorities of 23    the municipality. 24    (b) Upon the filing of the certified copies of the that 25ordinance under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) or upon the 26written proclamation by the Governor filed with the Secretary   HB1753- 9 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1of State and corporate authorities of a municipality under 2paragraph (2) of subsection (a), as required by this Section 3this Division and all of its provisions shall then and 4thereafter be applicable to the financially distressed city, 5shall govern and control its financial accounting, budgeting 6and taxing procedures and practices, and, subject to the 7limitations of subsection (a) of Section 8-12-22, shall remain 8in full force and effect with respect thereto until such time 9as the financial advisory authority established under Section 108-12-5 is abolished as provided in subsection (c) of Section 118-12-22.12(Source: P.A. 86-1211.) 13    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-4.5 new)14    Sec. 8-12-4.5. Review team powers and duties.15    (a) If the State Comptroller believes there is probable 16financial stress after his or her preliminary review and any 17input from the municipality under Section 8-12-4, the State 18Comptroller shall establish a review team for the municipality 19consisting of: the State Comptroller, or his or her designee; 20the Director of the Governor's Office of Management and 21Budget, or his or her designee; a member appointed by the 22Senate President; a member appointed by the Minority Leader of 23the Senate; a member appointed by the Speaker of the House of 24Representatives; and a member appointed by the Minority Leader 25of the House of Representatives. The State Comptroller may   HB1753- 10 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1appoint other State officials or other persons with relevant 2professional experience to serve on the review team. The State 3Comptroller shall provide administrative support and other 4support to a review team established under this Section. 5    (b) In conducting its review, the review team may:6        (1) examine the books and records of the municipality;7        (2) use the services of other State agencies and 8    employees in conducting the financial review; or9        (3) both examine the books and records of the 10    municipality and use the services of other State agencies 11    and employees in conducting the financial review. 12    The review team shall meet with city council and employees 13of the municipality as part of its review. At this meeting, the 14review team shall receive, discuss, and consider information 15provided by the municipality concerning the financial 16condition of the municipality. In addition, the review team 17shall hold at least one public meeting in the jurisdiction of 18the municipality at which the public may provide comments.19    (c) The review team shall submit a written final report of 20its findings to the State Comptroller within 60 days following 21its establishment or earlier if required by the State 22Comptroller. Upon request of a majority of the review team, 23the State Comptroller may grant one 30-day extension to the 2460-day limitation. A copy of the final report shall be 25forwarded by the State Comptroller to the Governor, mayor and 26city council of the municipality, the Speaker of the House of   HB1753- 11 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1Representatives, the Senate President, and each State Senator 2and State Representative who represents the municipality. The 3final report shall be posted on the State Comptroller's 4website within 7 days after the final report is submitted to 5the Governor. The final report shall identify the existence, 6or an indication of the likely occurrence, of any of the 7following if found:8        (1) a default in the payment of principal or interest 9    upon bonded obligations, notes, or other municipal 10    securities for which no funds or insufficient funds are on 11    hand and, if required, segregated in a special trust fund;12        (2) a failure for a period of 30 days or more beyond 13    the due date to transfer one or more of the following to 14    the appropriate agency:15            (i) taxes withheld on the income of employees;16            (ii) taxes collected by the municipality as agent 17        for another unit of local government; and18            (iii) a contribution required by a pension, 19        retirement, or benefit plan;20        (3) a failure for a period of 7 days or more after the 21    scheduled date of payment to pay wages and salaries or 22    other compensation owed to employees or benefits owed to 23    retirees;24        (4) the total amount of accounts payable for the 25    current fiscal year, as determined by the State 26    Comptroller, is in excess of 10% of the total expenditures   HB1753- 12 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1    of the municipality in that fiscal year;2        (5) a failure to eliminate an existing deficit in any 3    fund of the municipality within the 2-year period 4    preceding the end of the municipality's fiscal year during 5    which the review team final report is received;6        (6) a projection of a deficit in the general fund of 7    the municipality for the current fiscal year in excess of 8    5% of the budgeted revenues for the general fund;9        (7) a failure to comply in all material respects with 10    the terms of an approved deficit elimination plan or an 11    agreement entered into pursuant to a deficit elimination 12    plan;13        (8) the existence of material loans to the general 14    fund from other municipal funds that are not regularly 15    settled between the funds or that are increasing in scope;16        (9) the existence after the close of the fiscal year 17    of material recurring, non-budgeted subsidies from the 18    general fund to other major funds;19        (10) the existence of a structural operating deficit;20        (11) the use of restricted revenues for purposes not 21    authorized by law;22        (12) the likelihood that the municipality is or will 23    be unable to pay its obligations within 60 days after the 24    date of the review team's final report; and25        (13) any other facts and circumstances indicative of a 26    municipal financial emergency.  HB1753- 13 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1    (d) The review team shall include one of the following 2conclusions in its final report:3        (1) a financial emergency does not exist within the 4    municipality; or5        (2) a financial emergency exists within the 6    municipality.7    (e) The review team may, with the approval of the State 8Comptroller, appoint an individual or firm to carry out the 9review and submit a report to the review team for approval. The 10State Comptroller may enter into a contract with an individual 11or firm respecting the terms and conditions of the 12appointment.13    (f) For purposes of this Section:14        (1) A financial emergency does not exist within a 15    municipality if the final report concludes that none of 16    the factors in subsection (c) exist or are likely to occur 17    within the current or next fiscal year or, if they occur, 18    do not threaten the municipality's capability to provide 19    necessary governmental services essential to public 20    health, safety, and welfare.21        (2) A financial emergency exists within a municipality 22    if any of the following occur:23            (A) the final report concludes that one or more of 24        the factors in subsection (c) exist or are likely to 25        occur within the current or next fiscal year and 26        threaten the municipality's current and future   HB1753- 14 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1        capability to provide necessary governmental services 2        essential to the public health, safety, and welfare;3            (B) the municipality has failed to provide timely 4        and accurate information enabling the review team to 5        complete its final report; or6            (C) the mayor of the municipality concludes in 7        writing to the review team that one or more of the 8        factors in subsection (c) exist or are likely to occur 9        within the current or next fiscal year and threaten 10        the municipality's current and future capability to 11        provide necessary governmental services essential to 12        the public health, safety, and welfare, and the mayor 13        recommends that a financial emergency be declared and 14        the State Comptroller concurs with the recommendation. 15    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-10.5 new)16    Sec. 8-12-10.5. State grants. If a financially distressed 17city or Authority is awarded a State grant, any moneys the 18financially distressed city or Authority would be required to 19match under the grant are waived unless the moneys under the 20grant come from federal moneys that require the match. A 21municipality's status as a financially distressed city may not 22negatively impact a decision of whether or not to award a State 23grant to the municipality or negatively impact the amount of 24moneys received by the municipality from a State grant.   HB1753- 15 -LRB104 08074 RTM 18120 b1    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-21.5 new)2    Sec. 8-12-21.5. Noncompliance by corporate authorities or 3employees of a municipality. If a financially distressed city, 4including its corporate authorities or employees, materially 5violates the requirements of this Division, the Authority may 6commence action in the circuit court within any county in 7which the municipality is located if the Authority has given 8the corporate authorities of the city written notice that 9includes: a detailed explanation of the material violation; a 10statement of the Authority's intention to enforce the 11provisions of this Division by commencing an action; a 12statement giving the corporate authorities at least 15 days to 13correct the violation before the Authority may commence an 14action. 15    (65 ILCS 5/8-12-23)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-12-23)16    Sec. 8-12-23. A financially distressed city to which this 17Division applies shall remain subject to all other applicable 18provisions of law this Act, except as limited by this 19Division; provided, however, that in case of a conflict 20between the provisions of this Division and any other 21provision of law this Act, the provisions of this Division 22shall control.23(Source: P.A. 86-1211.)